Hawaii statutes.
§143-1 Definitions. Whenever used in
this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Officer" means any sheriff, deputy,
any member of a police force in counties with a population of less than 100,000
and animal control officers of the several counties of the State.

"Owner" includes every person owning,
harboring, or keeping a dog; provided that if the owner is a minor under the
age of eighteen years, the parent, guardian, or other person having the care,
custody, or control of the minor shall be irrebuttably presumed to be the
owner.

"Unlicensed dog" means any dog for
which the license for the current year has not been paid or to which the tag
provided for in this chapter is not attached. [L 1941, c 268, §1; RL 1945,
§7151; RL 1955, §156-1; am L 1963, c 85, §3; HRS §143-1; am L 1983, c 227, §2;
am L 1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 281, §11]

Revision Note

Definitions
rearranged.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next